Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 21.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-396
Rules and regulations.

The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the unified carrier registration plan and agreement.

Laws 2007, LB358, § 5;

Laws 2009, LB331, § 21.